Georgia, session 2025_26, SB166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions applicable to counties only, is amended by revising Code Section 36-1-20, relating
to ordinances for governing and policing of unincorporated areas of county, as follows:
"36-1-20.
(a) The governing authority of each county, for the purpose of protecting and preserving
the public health, safety, and welfare, is authorized to adopt ordinances for the governing
S. B. 166
- 1 -

LC 47 3350
and policing of the unincorporated areas of the county, violations of which ordinances may
be punished by fine or imprisonment confinement or both. Without limiting the generality
of the foregoing, such ordinances may provide for traffic regulation, including adoption of
the uniform rules of the road under Chapter 6 of Title 40, may provide for the regulation
and control of litter in the same manner as municipal ordinances under Code
Section 16-7-48, and may provide for the implementation and enforcement of any power
or duty vested in the county governing authority.
(b) Each such ordinance shall specify the maximum punishment which may be imposed
for a violation of the ordinance; and except as provided for in Code Section 36-60-33, in
no case shall the maximum punishment for the violation of any such ordinance exceed a
fine of $1,000.00 or imprisonment confinement for 60 days or both; provided, however,
that, for violation of a pretreatment standard or requirement adopted pursuant to the federal
Clean Water Act, the ordinance may specify that the fine may be up to $1,000.00 per day
for each violation by an industrial user.
(c) Jurisdiction over violations of such county ordinances shall be in the magistrate court
of the county; and procedure for enforcement of such ordinances shall be as provided in
Article 4 of Chapter 10 of Title 15; provided, however, that jurisdiction over ordinances
having to do with traffic offenses shall be in the court or courts having jurisdiction over
state traffic offenses.
(d) This Code section shall not affect the jurisdiction of or procedure in any other court
which has jurisdiction over violations of county ordinances."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 60 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to provisions
applicable to counties and municipal corporations, is amended by adding a new Code section
to read as follows:
S. B. 166
- 2 -

LC 47 3350
"36-60-33.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'county or municipal codes or ordinances' means
zoning ordinances and resolutions, ordinances and resolutions enacting subdivision
regulations, environmental ordinances and resolutions, state minimum standard codes
provided for in Code Section 8-2-25, ordinances and resolutions enacted pursuant to Code
Section 8-2-25, other ordinances and resolutions regulating the development of real
property, and ordinances and regulations providing for control of litter and debris, control
of junked or abandoned vehicles, and control of overgrown vegetation. Notwithstanding
the above, such term shall not include:
(1) Those codes and ordinances requiring a permit, unless the alleged violator has failed
to secure all necessary valid permits under said codes and ordinances; or
(2) Any local amendments to the state minimum standard codes provided for in Code
Section 8-2-25 not adopted in conformity with the requirements of subsection (c) of such
Code section.
(b) Notwithstanding the provision of any local law, including municipal charters, to the
contrary, each county and municipality is authorized to provide for enhanced monetary
penalties for repeat and subsequent violations of any county or municipal codes or
ordinances in cases pertaining to public health and safety. Enhanced monetary penalties
authorized by this Code section shall not exceed:
(1) An amount of $3,000.00 for a second violation of a county or municipal code or
ordinance;
(2) An amount of $5,000.00 for a third violation of a county or municipal code or
ordinance;
(3) An amount of $10,000.00 for a fourth violation of a county or municipal code or
ordinance; and
(4) An amount of $15,000.00 for a fifth or subsequent violation of a county or municipal
code or ordinance.
S. B. 166
- 3 -

LC 47 3350
(c) The enhanced monetary penalties authorized by this Code section shall not apply to:
(1) Any property that is subject to a homestead exemption granted pursuant to
Article VII, Section II, Paragraph II of the Constitution; or
(2) Any person owning less than ten single-family or duplex residential properties within
the geographic boundaries of the same county, whether incorporated or unincorporated,
as the property that is the subject of the code or ordinance enforcement action, regardless
of whether or not such additional properties are located within the jurisdiction bringing
the enforcement act."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 166
- 4 -